Utah statutes.
73-28-405.   Transfer of title to project and water rights to districts.
(1)  The board shall convey the project's title and its associated water
rights to the districts if:
(a)  the state has been fully compensated for all of its reimbursable costs;
(b)  the board finds that the conveyance of the project's title would be in
the best interest of the state, the districts, and those receiving developed
water; and
(c)  the districts enter into an agreement with each other and the board that
would ensure the continued operation, maintenance, repair, and replacement of
the project.
(2)  The board shall convey the project's title and its associated water
rights to the districts in proportion to the amount each district paid for the
developed water it received.
